Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1467.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1210.560 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section, "community schools" means public
schools that provide services and supports which fit the needs of
each neighborhood, created and run by the people who know their
children best: families, educators, community organizations, local
governments, and the students themselves, all working together.

Req. No. 11816 Page 1

Comm unity schools offer evidence-based pathways by providing
tailored services before, during, and after school.
B. The State Board of Education may assist and, if funding is
available, award grants to school district boards of education to
establish pilot projects that create community schools within a
school district or at a school site. Projects may involve entire
districts, individual school sites, a combination of school sites,
or elements of school sites individually or in combination.
C. Pilot project plans for community schools shall contain the
following minimum elements:
1. A person designated as the community school coordinator, who
shall complete leadership training provided by an Oklahoma-based
nonprofit organization that uses the science of hope to improve
classrooms and campuses;
2. A comprehensive needs assessment process that includes the
following stakeholders:
a. parents,
b. community leaders,
c. teachers,
d. site and district administrators,
e. other education employees, and
f. students, where age-appropriate.
3. Site-based collaborative leadership, practices, and shared
responsibility; and
Req. No. 11816 Page 2

4. An ongoing stakeholder engagement process.
Pilot projects for community schools, when possible, shall also
address additional components including, but not limited to,
strengthened curriculum and academic programs, expanded learning
opportunities, and integrated student supports or wraparound
services.
D. The State Board of Education may promulgate rules and
regulations for the operation and implementation of the pilot
projects and to assist school districts in accessing pilot start-up
funds from the United States Department of Education for selected
projects.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11816 SW 12/10/24










Req. No. 11816 Page 3